test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tests_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


# â stems


  Noun - hattâ: # â-stems hattu
    hattâ+N+Sg+Nom: hattâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Gen: haatâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Acc: haatâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Ill: haatân
    hattâ+N+Sg+Loc: haatâst
    hattâ+N+Sg+Com: hattáin
    hattâ+N+Ess: hattân
    hattâ+N+Par: hattâd
    hattâ+N+Pl+Nom: haatah
    hattâ+N+Pl+Gen: haatâi
    hattâ+N+Pl+Acc: haatâid
    hattâ+N+Pl+Ill: hattáid
    hattâ+N+Pl+Loc: haatâin
    hattâ+N+Pl+Com: hatâiguin
    hattâ+N+Pl+Abe: hatâittáá


  Noun - kielâ: # â-stems
    kielâ+N+Sg+Nom: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Gen: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Acc: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Ill: kielân
    kielâ+N+Sg+Loc: kielâst
    kielâ+N+Sg+Com: kieláin
    kielâ+N+Sg+Abe: kielâttáá
    kielâ+N+Ess: kiellân
    kielâ+N+Par: kiellâd
    kielâ+N+Pl+Nom: kielah
    kielâ+N+Pl+Gen: kielâi
    kielâ+N+Pl+Acc: kielâid
    kielâ+N+Pl+Ill: kieláid
    kielâ+N+Pl+Loc: kielâin
    kielâ+N+Pl+Com: kielâiguin
    kielâ+N+Pl+Abe: kielâittáá


  Noun - laahâ: # â-stems
    laahâ+N+Sg+Nom: laahâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Ill: laahân
    laahâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavâst
    laahâ+N+Sg+Com: laavváin
    laahâ+N+Sg+Abe: lavâttáá
    laahâ+N+Ess: laahhân
    laahâ+N+Par: laahhâd
    laahâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavah
    laahâ+N+Pl+Gen: laavâi
    laahâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavâid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavváid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavâin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Com: lavâiguin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Abe: lavâittáá

  Noun - sollâ: # â-stems XXX
    sollâ+N+Sg+Nom: sollâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Gen: soolâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Acc: soolâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Ill: soolân
    sollâ+N+Sg+Loc: soolâst
    sollâ+N+Sg+Com: solláin
    sollâ+N+Ess: sollân
    sollâ+N+Par: sollâd
    sollâ+N+Pl+Nom: soolah
    sollâ+N+Pl+Gen: soolâi
    sollâ+N+Pl+Acc: soolâid
    sollâ+N+Pl+Ill: solláid
    sollâ+N+Pl+Loc: soolâin
    sollâ+N+Pl+Com: solâiguin
    sollâ+N+Pl+Abe: solâittáá

# á stems

  Noun - čuhčá: # á-stems
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Nom: čuhčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Gen: čuuvčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Acc: čuuvčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Ill: čuuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Loc: čuuvčást
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Com: čuvččáin
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Abe: čuvčáttáá
    čuhčá+N+Ess: čuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Par: čuhčád
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Nom: čuuvčáh
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Gen: čuuvčái
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Acc: čuuvčáid
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Ill: čuvččáid
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Loc: čuuvčáin
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Com: čuvčáiguin
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Abe: čuvčáittáá

  Noun - kuáhčá: # á-stems
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Nom: kuáhčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Gen: kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Acc: kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Ill: kuáhčán
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Loc: kuávčást
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Com: kuávččáin
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Abe: kuávčáttáá
    kuáhčá+N+Ess: kuáhčán
    kuáhčá+N+Par: kuáhčád
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Nom: kuávčáh
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Gen: kuávčái
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Acc: kuávčáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Ill: kuávččáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Loc: kuávčáin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Com: kuávčáiguin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Abe: kuávčáittáá


  Noun - fáddá: # á-stems
    fáddá+N+Sg+Nom: fáddá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Gen: fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Acc: fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Ill: fáádán
    fáddá+N+Sg+Loc: fáádást
    fáddá+N+Sg+Abe: fádáttáá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Com: fáddáin
    fáddá+N+Ess: fáddán
    fáddá+N+Par: fáddád
    fáddá+N+Pl+Nom: fáádáh
    fáddá+N+Pl+Gen: fáádái
    fáddá+N+Pl+Acc: fáádáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Loc: fáádáin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Ill: fáddáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Com: fádáiguin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Abe: fádáittáá


  Noun - kissá: # á-stems
    kissá+N+Sg+Nom: kissá
    kissá+N+Sg+Gen: kisá
    kissá+N+Sg+Acc: kisá
    kissá+N+Sg+Ill: kiisán
    kissá+N+Sg+Loc: kissáást
    kissá+N+Sg+Com: kissáin
    kissá+N+Sg+Abe: kisáttáá
    kissá+N+Ess: kissán
    kissá+N+Par: kissád
    kissá+N+Pl+Nom: kisáh
    kissá+N+Pl+Gen: kisái
    kissá+N+Pl+Acc: kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Ill: kissáid
    kissá+N+Pl+Loc: kissáin
    kissá+N+Pl+Com: kisáiguin
    kissá+N+Pl+Abe: kisáittáá

  Noun - lássá: # á-stems
    lássá+N+Sg+Nom: lássá
    lássá+N+Sg+Gen: láásá
    lássá+N+Sg+Acc: láásá
    lássá+N+Sg+Ill: láásán
    lássá+N+Sg+Loc: láásást
    lássá+N+Sg+Com: lássáin
    lássá+N+Sg+Abe: lásáttáá
    lássá+N+Ess: lássán
    lássá+N+Par: lássád
    lássá+N+Pl+Nom: láásáh
    lássá+N+Pl+Gen: láásái
    lássá+N+Pl+Acc: láásáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Ill: lássáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Loc: láásáin
    lássá+N+Pl+Com: lásáiguin
    lássá+N+Pl+Abe: lásáittáá
   
  Noun - pittá: # á-stems pala
    pittá+N+Sg+Nom: pittá
    pittá+N+Sg+Gen: pitá
    pittá+N+Sg+Acc: pitá
    pittá+N+Pl+Ill: pittáid
    pittá+N+Sg+Loc: pittáást
    pittá+N+Sg+Com: pittáin
    pittá+N+Sg+Abe: pitáttáá
    pittá+N+Ess: pittán
    pittá+N+Par: pittád
    pittá+N+Pl+Nom: pitáh
    pittá+N+Pl+Gen: pitái
    pittá+N+Pl+Acc: pittáid
    pittá+N+Sg+Ill: piitán
    pittá+N+Pl+Loc: pittáin
    pittá+N+Pl+Com: pitáiguin
    pittá+N+Pl+Abe: pitáittáá

  Noun - ráksá: # á-stems
    ráksá+N+Sg+Nom: ráksá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Gen: ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Acc: ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Ill: rááksán
    ráksá+N+Sg+Loc: ráávsást
    ráksá+N+Sg+Com: rávssáin
    ráksá+N+Sg+Abe: rávsáttáá
    ráksá+N+Ess: ráksán
    ráksá+N+Par: ráksád
    ráksá+N+Pl+Nom: ráávsáh
    ráksá+N+Pl+Gen: ráávsái
    ráksá+N+Pl+Acc: ráávsáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Ill: rávssáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Loc: ráávsáin
    ráksá+N+Pl+Com: rávsáiguin
    ráksá+N+Pl+Abe: rávsáittáá

  Noun - riččá: # á-stems
    riččá+N+Sg+Nom: riččá
    riččá+N+Sg+Gen: ričá
    riččá+N+Sg+Acc: ričá
    riččá+N+Sg+Ill: riičán
    riččá+N+Sg+Loc: riččáást
    riččá+N+Sg+Com: riččáin
    riččá+N+Sg+Abe: ričáttáá
    riččá+N+Ess: riččán
    riččá+N+Par: riččád
    riččá+N+Pl+Nom: ričáh
    riččá+N+Pl+Gen: ričái
    riččá+N+Pl+Acc: riččáid
    riččá+N+Pl+Ill: riččáid
    riččá+N+Pl+Loc: riččáin
    riččá+N+Pl+Com: ričáiguin
    riččá+N+Pl+Abe: ričáittáá
   
   
  Noun - sukká: # á-stems
    sukká+N+Sg+Nom: sukká
    sukká+N+Sg+Gen: suhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Acc: suhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Ill: suukán
    sukká+N+Sg+Loc: suhháást
    sukká+N+Sg+Com: suhháin
    sukká+N+Sg+Abe: suháttáá
    sukká+N+Ess: sukkán
    sukká+N+Par: sukkád
    sukká+N+Pl+Nom: suháh
    sukká+N+Pl+Gen: suhái
    sukká+N+Pl+Acc: suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Ill: suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Loc: suhháin
    sukká+N+Pl+Com: suháiguin
    sukká+N+Pl+Abe: suháittáá


  Noun - tikká: # á-stems
    tikká+N+Sg+Nom: tikká
    tikká+N+Sg+Gen: tiká
    tikká+N+Sg+Acc: tiká
    tikká+N+Sg+Ill: tiikán
    tikká+N+Sg+Loc: tikkáást
    tikká+N+Sg+Com: tikkáin
    tikká+N+Sg+Abe: tikáttáá
    tikká+N+Ess: tikkán
    tikká+N+Par: tikkád
    tikká+N+Pl+Nom: tikáh
    tikká+N+Pl+Gen: tikái
    tikká+N+Pl+Acc: tikkáid
    tikká+N+Pl+Ill: tikkáid
    tikká+N+Pl+Loc: tikkáin
    tikká+N+Pl+Com: tikáiguin
    tikká+N+Pl+Abe: tikáittáá


  Noun - tigge: # e-stems
    tigge+N+Sg+Nom: tigge
    tigge+N+Sg+Gen: tige
    tigge+N+Sg+Acc: tige
    tigge+N+Sg+Ill: tiigán
    tigge+N+Sg+Loc: tiggeest
    tigge+N+Sg+Com: tiggijn
    tigge+N+Sg+Abe: tigettáá
    tigge+N+Ess: tiggen
    tigge+N+Par: tigged
    tigge+N+Pl+Nom: tigeh
    tigge+N+Pl+Gen: tiigij
    tigge+N+Pl+Acc: tiigijd
    tigge+N+Pl+Ill: tiggijd
    tigge+N+Pl+Loc: tiggijn
    tigge+N+Pl+Com: tigijguin
    tigge+N+Pl+Abe: tigijttáá


  Noun - alme: # e-stems
    alme+N+Sg+Nom: alme
    alme+N+Sg+Gen: alme
    alme+N+Sg+Acc: alme
    alme+N+Sg+Ill: aalman
    alme+N+Sg+Loc: almeest
    alme+N+Sg+Com: olmijn
    alme+N+Sg+Abe: almettáá
    alme+N+Ess: almen
    alme+N+Par: almed
    alme+N+Pl+Nom: almeh
    alme+N+Pl+Gen: oolmij
    alme+N+Pl+Acc: oolmijd
    alme+N+Pl+Ill: olmijd
    alme+N+Pl+Loc: oolmijn
    alme+N+Pl+Com: olmijguin
    alme+N+Pl+Abe: olmijttáá

# i stems

  Noun - kyeli: # i-e-á-stems
    kyeli+N+Sg+Nom: kyeli
    kyeli+N+Sg+Gen: kyele
    kyeli+N+Sg+Acc: kyele
    kyeli+N+Sg+Ill: kuálán
    kyeli+N+Sg+Loc: kyeleest
    kyeli+N+Sg+Com: kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Sg+Abe: kyelettáá
    kyeli+N+Ess: kyellin
    kyeli+N+Par: kyellid
    kyeli+N+Pl+Nom: kyeleh
    kyeli+N+Pl+Gen: kuolij
    kyeli+N+Pl+Acc: kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Ill: kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Loc: kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Pl+Com: kuolijguin
    kyeli+N+Pl+Abe: kuolijttáá

  Noun - äigi: # i-stems
    äigi+N+Sg+Nom: äigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Gen: ääigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Acc: ääigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Ill: ááigán
    äigi+N+Sg+Loc: ääigist
    äigi+N+Sg+Com: aigijn
    äigi+N+Sg+Abe: äigittáá
    äigi+N+Ess: äigin
    äigi+N+Par: äigid
    äigi+N+Pl+Nom: ääigih
    äigi+N+Pl+Gen: aaigij
    äigi+N+Pl+Acc: aaigijd
    äigi+N+Pl+Ill: aigijd
    äigi+N+Pl+Loc: aaigijn
    äigi+N+Pl+Com: aigijguin
    äigi+N+Pl+Abe: aigijttáá


  Noun - skappi: # i-stems
    skappi+N+Sg+Nom: skappi
    skappi+N+Sg+Gen: skaapi
    skappi+N+Sg+Acc: skaapi
    skappi+N+Sg+Ill: skaapin
    skappi+N+Sg+Loc: skaapist
    skappi+N+Sg+Com: skappijn
    skappi+N+Sg+Abe: skapittáá
    skappi+N+Ess: skappin
    skappi+N+Par: skappid
    skappi+N+Pl+Nom: skaapih
    skappi+N+Pl+Gen: skaapij
    skappi+N+Pl+Acc: skaapijd
    skappi+N+Pl+Ill: skappijd
    skappi+N+Pl+Loc: skaapijn
    skappi+N+Pl+Com: skapijguin
    skappi+N+Pl+Abe: skapijttáá


  Noun - säämi: # i-stems
    säämi+N+Sg+Nom: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Gen: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Acc: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Ill: sáámán
    säämi+N+Sg+Loc: säämist
    säämi+N+Sg+Com: saamijn
    säämi+N+Sg+Abe: sämittáá
    säämi+N+Ess: säämmin
    säämi+N+Par: säämmid
    säämi+N+Pl+Nom: säämih
    säämi+N+Pl+Gen: saamij
    säämi+N+Pl+Acc: saamijd
    säämi+N+Pl+Ill: saamijd
    säämi+N+Pl+Loc: saamijn
    säämi+N+Pl+Com: samijguin
    säämi+N+Pl+Abe: samijttáá


  Noun - uási: # i-stems
    uási+N+Sg+Nom: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Gen: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Acc: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Ill: uáisán
    uási+N+Sg+Loc: uásist
    uási+N+Sg+Com: ossijn
    uási+N+Sg+Abe: uásittáá
    uási+N+Ess: uássin
    uási+N+Par: uássid
    uási+N+Pl+Nom: uásih
    uási+N+Pl+Gen: oosij
    uási+N+Pl+Acc: oosijd
    uási+N+Pl+Ill: ossijd
    uási+N+Pl+Loc: oosijn
    uási+N+Pl+Com: osijguin
    uási+N+Pl+Abe: osijttáá



# o stems

  Noun - asto: # o-stems
    asto+N+Sg+Nom: asto
    asto+N+Sg+Gen: asto
    asto+N+Sg+Acc: asto
    asto+N+Sg+Ill: aaston
    asto+N+Sg+Loc: astoost
    asto+N+Sg+Com: astoin
    asto+N+Sg+Abe: astottáá
    asto+N+Ess: aston
    asto+N+Par: astod
    asto+N+Pl+Nom: astoh
    asto+N+Pl+Gen: astoi
    asto+N+Pl+Acc: astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Ill: astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Loc: astoin
    asto+N+Pl+Com: astoiguin
    asto+N+Pl+Abe: astoittáá

  Noun - cijkko: # o-stems
    cijkko+N+Sg+Nom: cijkko
    cijkko+N+Sg+Gen: cijho
    cijkko+N+Sg+Ill: ciijkon
    cijkko+N+Sg+Loc: cijhoost
    cijkko+N+Sg+Com: cijhhoin
    cijkko+N+Ess: cijkkon
    cijkko+N+Par: cijkkod
    cijkko+N+Pl+Nom: cijhoh
    cijkko+N+Pl+Gen: cijhoi
    cijkko+N+Pl+Acc: cijhoid
    cijkko+N+Pl+Ill: cijhhoid
    cijkko+N+Pl+Loc: cijhoin
    cijkko+N+Pl+Com: cijhoiguin
    cijkko+N+Pl+Abe: cijhoittáá


  Noun - ito: # o-stems Morottaja
    ito+N+Sg+Nom: ito
    ito+N+Sg+Gen: iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Acc: iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Ill: iton
    ito+N+Sg+Loc: iiđoost
    ito+N+Sg+Com: iđoin
    ito+N+Sg+Abe: iđottáá
    ito+N+Ess: ittoon
    ito+N+Par: ittood
    ito+N+Pl+Nom: iđoh
    ito+N+Pl+Gen: iđoi
    ito+N+Pl+Acc: iđoid
    ito+N+Pl+Ill: iđoid
    ito+N+Pl+Loc: iiđoin
    ito+N+Pl+Com: iđoiguin
    ito+N+Pl+Abe: iđoittáá

  Noun - millo: # o-stems
    millo+N+Sg+Nom: millo
    millo+N+Sg+Gen: milo
    millo+N+Sg+Acc: milo
    millo+N+Sg+Ill: miilon
    millo+N+Sg+Loc: milloost
    millo+N+Sg+Com: milloin
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: milottáá
    millo+N+Ess: millon
    millo+N+Par: millod
    millo+N+Pl+Nom: miloh
    millo+N+Pl+Gen: miloi
    millo+N+Pl+Acc: miloid
    millo+N+Pl+Ill: miloid
    millo+N+Pl+Loc: miloin
    millo+N+Pl+Com: miloiguin
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: miloittáá



# u stems
